Missouri, session 2026, HB1662.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 191.824, to read as follows:
191.824. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, each
2 public school, as such term is defined in section 160.011, shall provide each student
3 enrolled in such public school with one free breakfast and one free lunch each day such
4 student attends classes in such public school.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.